Mississippi, session 2026, HB1713.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  (1) As used in this section, the following words have the meanings as defined in this subsection: (a)  "State Sponsored Life Insurance Program" or "program" means the life insurance program offered exclusively to the members of the Mississippi National Guard through the National Guard Association of Mississippi (NGAMS), as authorized under 37 USC Section 707. (b)  "Member" means any commissioned officer, warrant officer, or enlisted member of the Mississippi Army National Guard or the Mississippi Air National Guard. (2)  The Adjutant General of Mississippi shall serve as the official sponsor of the State Sponsored Life Insurance Program and, in coordination with the National Guard Association of Mississippi, shall: (a) Facilitate and coordinate all efforts to make the program available to all members of the Mississippi National Guard; (b)  Provide opportunities for members to purchase, enroll in, or modify coverage under the program, including the designation or change of beneficiaries; (c)  Allow program representatives to provide information and briefings on the program during annual training, drill weekends, and other scheduled events to educate members and their families on program benefits; and (d) Facilitate and coordinate requested allotments for the payment of premiums with the appropriate United States Property and Fiscal Office, consistent with federal regulations governing the Defense Finance and Accounting Service (DFAS). (3)  Participation in the State Sponsored Life Insurance Program shall be voluntary.  Nothing in this section shall require any member of the Mississippi National Guard to purchase or maintain coverage. (4)  The National Guard Association of Mississippi shall select the insurer or insurers used to provide coverage under the State Sponsored Life Insurance Program and shall administer the program in compliance with applicable federal and state law. (5)  The purpose of this section is to ensure that every member of the Mississippi National Guard is afforded the opportunity to learn about, enroll in, and benefit from the protections offered by the State Sponsored Life Insurance Program as part of the Military Department's ongoing efforts to support service members and their families. SECTION 2.  Section 25-15-201, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 25-15-201.  The Military Department is authorized and empowered to procure and pay for group death and dismemberment insurance coverage to protect members of the National Guard and their estates, or their named beneficiaries, to the extent of Twenty-five Thousand Dollars ($25,000.00) per person, if death or dismemberment occurs while performing authorized state military duty. The premiums on such insurance shall be calculated on a man-day basis and coverage shall be in effect only during such duty. SECTION 3.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.